Hawaii statutes.
§84-19 Violation. (a) Any favorable
state action obtained in violation of the code of ethics for legislators or
employees and former employees is voidable in the same manner as voidable
contracts as provided for under section 84-16; and the State by the attorney
general may pursue all legal and equitable remedies available to it.

(b) The State by the attorney general may
recover any fee, compensation, gift, or profit received by any person as a
result of a violation of the code of ethics by a legislator or employee or
former legislator or employee. Action to recover under this subsection shall
be brought within one year of a determination of such violation.

(c) Any violation of this chapter by an
employee, candidate for election to and elected delegate to the constitutional
convention shall be punishable only in accordance with the code of ethics
adopted by the constitutional convention. [L 1972, c 163, pt of §1; am L 1979,
c 91, §7; am L 1981, c 82, §11; am L 1989, c 291, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next